Hawaii statutes.
[§428-602] Member's power to dissociate;
wrongful dissociation. (a) A member has the power to dissociate from a
limited liability company at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express
will.

(b) A member's dissociation from a limited
liability company is wrongful only if:

(1) It is in breach of an express provision of the
operating agreement; or

(2) Before the expiration of the term of a company
having a specified term:

(A) The member withdraws by express will;

(B) The member is expelled by judicial
determination under section 428-601(5);

(C) The member is dissociated by becoming a
debtor in bankruptcy; or

(D) In the case of a member who is not an
individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the member is
expelled or otherwise dissociated because it wilfully dissolved or terminated
its existence.

(c) A member who wrongfully dissociates from a
limited liability company is liable to the company and to the other members for
damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other
obligation of the member to the company or to the other members.

(d) If a limited liability company does not
dissolve and wind up its business as a result of a member's wrongful
dissociation under subsection (b), damages sustained by the company for the
wrongful dissociation shall be offset against distributions otherwise due the
member after the dissociation. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next